Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.080

Order requiring delivery of money or property to sheriff.

Where it appears from the examination or testimony taken in the special proceedings authorized by this chapter that the judgment debtor has in his or her possession or under his or her control money or other personal property belonging to him or her, or that one or more articles of personal property capable of manual delivery, his or her right to the possession whereof is not substantially disputed, are in the possession or under the control of another person, the judge by whom the order or warrant was granted, or to whom it is returnable, may in his or her discretion, and upon such notice given to such persons as he or she deems just, or without notice, make an order directing the judgment debtor, or other person, immediately to pay the money or deliver the articles of personal property to a sheriff designated in the order, unless a receiver has been appointed or a receivership has been extended to the special proceedings, and in that case to the receiver.

[ 2011 c 336 s 154; 1893 c 133 s 8; RRS s 620.]